Nebraska, session 109, LB1213.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1213 LB1213
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 10 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Case Management Licensure Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Inconsistent and ineffective case management within child
welfare systems can cause irreversible harm to children and families;
(b) Data from the department demonstrates that inefficient case
management has contributed to: (i) The loss or jeopardization of federal
Title IV-E funding administered through the Children's Bureau of the
United States Department of Labor; (ii) increased and unnecessary public
expenditures related to mental health services and trauma responses
arising from unsubstantiated abuse and neglect investigations; and (iii)
prolonged neglect of children and families due to excessive caseloads and
inadequate oversight;
(c) Existing complaint and accountability mechanisms are laborious
and insufficient and may expose complainants to retaliation; and
(d) Establishing a licensure, oversight, and accountability
framework for individuals performing case management functions will
promote professionalism, consistency, and public trust.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to improve child welfare
outcomes by strengthening accountability, improving compliance,
protecting due process, and safeguarding federal funding streams.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Case Management Licensure Act:
(1) Case manager means a social worker, investigator, supervisor, or
other individual employed by, or contracted with, the department who
performs case management, investigative, or supervisory functions related
to child welfare, child protective services, or foster care;
(2) Complainant means an individual affected by, or reporting
conduct subject to, review under the Case Management Licensure Act;
(3) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(4) Licensure means the certification granted under the Case
Management Licensure Act authorizing an individual to perform case
-2-

LB1213 LB1213
2026 2026
management duties in the state;
(5) Malfeasance means intentional misconduct or wrongful conduct,
including falsification of records or abuse of authority;
(6) Negligence means a failure to exercise reasonable care
consistent with professional standards; and
(7) Office means the Foster Care Review Office.
Sec. 4. (1) No individual shall perform case management in the
child welfare system unless licensed pursuant to the Case Management
Licensure Act.
(2) Licensure shall be valid for a period of two years and shall be
subject to renewal upon compliance with standards established by the
office.
(3) The licensure requirement shall apply to all case managers
regardless of employment classification, including employees,
contractors, or subcontractors.
Sec. 5. (1) The office shall serve as the licensure and oversight
authority under the Case Management Licensure Act.
(2) The office may: (a) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to administer and enforce the Case Management Licensure Act;
(b) establish professional standards and standard operating procedures
for licensed case managers; (c) receive, investigate, and adjudicate
complaints; (d) impose disciplinary actions, including suspension or
revocation of licensure; and (e) develop and administer the appeal
process described in section 6 of this act.
Sec. 6. (1) The office shall establish a formal process for
reviewing complaints and licensure infractions, suspensions, and
revocations.
(2) An appeal of an initial office finding shall be reviewed within
sixty days after the date the appeal is filed.
(3) The office shall issue a written decision within thirty days
after the date the appeal review is completed, which may include (a)
-3-

LB1213 LB1213
2026 2026
affirmation of the original finding, (b) amendment of the finding, or (c)
a determination that the complaint is unfounded.
(4) A request for amendment of an office decision shall be filed
within ten days after the date the decision is issued.
(5) Amendments shall be granted only upon submission of additional
evidence demonstrating that (a) the scope of harm or impact is less than
originally determined or (b) the case manager has rectified or reversed
the impact of the conduct to the satisfaction of affected parties.
Sec. 7. (1) If the office determines that a licensed case manager
has engaged in misconduct, including, but not limited to (a)
falsification or alteration of documents, (b) submission or use of
inaccurate, misleading, or incomplete information, whether verbal or
written, (c) knowingly providing false statements through emails, text
messages, reports, or other case-related materials, or (d) any act or
omission intended to improperly influence, delay, or affect the outcome
of an open or closed case, the office shall impose disciplinary action.
(2) Disciplinary action under this section may include (a)
suspension of licensure for a defined period, (b) revocation of
licensure, (c) conditions for reinstatement, including additional
training, supervision, or a corrective action plan, or (d) permanent
disqualification from licensure.
(3) Revocation of licensure shall be mandatory when the office finds
that the misconduct was intentional, reckless, or resulted in substantial
harm to a child, a family, a foster parent, or the integrity of the child
welfare system.
(4) Loss of licensure under this section shall prohibit the
individual from serving in any case management, investigative, or
supervisory capacity in the child welfare system.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
authority of any other state entity to act within its lawful
jurisdiction.
-4-

LB1213 LB1213
2026 2026
Sec. 8. (1) Nothing in the Case Management Licensure Act shall be
construed to create state liability for acts or omissions of licensed
case managers.
(2) Each licensed case manager, investigator, and supervisor shall
have an independent duty to act with prudence, diligence, integrity, and
fairness as a representative of the state and the department.
Sec. 9. The office, in consultation with the department, shall
adopt standards to: (1) Reduce the duration of investigations; (2)
require timely notice to families and foster parents of investigations,
except where prohibited by law; (3) require weekly updates and clear
expectations during the life cycle of an investigation; (4) clearly
define conditions under which investigations may remain open; (5)
prohibit placing foster homes on hold during investigations unless there
is definitive evidence of violence or malfeasance, while allowing respite
care where appropriate; and (6) require consideration and documentation
of foster parent input.
Sec. 10. The office shall electronically submit an annual report to
the Legislature and publish the report on the department's website. The
report shall include: (1) Licensure activity and disciplinary actions;
(2) trends in complaints and investigations; (3) estimated fiscal impacts
of unsubstantiated removals, malicious prosecution, or case management
misconduct; and (4) progress toward improving efficiency, compliance, and
federal Title IV-E funding eligibility.
-5-